Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.700

Not applicable to certain political subdivisions.

The provisions of RCW 29A.92.005 through 29A.92.030, 29A.92.060 through 29A.92.130, and 29A.92.900 are not applicable to cities and towns with populations under one thousand or to school districts with K-12 full-time equivalent enrollments of less than two hundred fifty.

[ 2018 c 113 s 501.]